Maryland, session 2026, HB1525.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
2–1002.
(g) (1) [In this subsection, “allowance” means one ton of carbon dioxide that
may be bought, sold, traded, or banked for use under the Regional Greenhouse Gas
Initiative.
(2) Not later than June 30, 2007] ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, the
Governor shall [include] WITHDRAW the State as a full participant in the Regional
Greenhouse Gas Initiative among Mid–Atlantic and Northeast states.
[(3) The State may withdraw from the Initiative, as provided in the
December 20, 2005 memorandum of understanding of the Initiative, at any time after
January 1, 2009, if the General Assembly enacts a law to approve the withdrawal.
(4) If the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative expires and there is a
successor organization with the same purposes and goals, the Governor is encouraged to
join the State in the successor organization.
(5) Notwithstanding § 2–107 of this title, all of the proceeds from the sale
of Maryland allowances under the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative shall be deposited
in the Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund under § 9–20B–05 of the State
Government Article.
(6) If the State’s participation in the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative
ceases for any reason, the Governor shall report to the General Assembly, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, regarding:
(i) Why participation ceased; and

HOUSE BILL 1525 3
(ii) A plan to reduce carbon dioxide emissions from power plants in
the State that considers the use of Maryland grown, native, warm season grasses as a
possible method of reducing carbon emissions.]
(2) THE STATE MAY REJOIN AS A FULL PARTICIPANT IN THE
REGIONAL GREENHOUSE GAS INITIATIVE IF:
(I) ALL OTHER STATES SERVED BY PJM INTERCONNECTION
BECOME FULL MEMBERS OF THE REGIONAL GREENHOUSE GAS INITIATIVE; OR
(II) THE STATE BECOMES AND REMAINS A NET EXPORTER OF
ELECTRICITY.
(3) NOTWITHSTANDING § 2–107 OF THIS TITLE, IF THE STATE
REJOINS THE REGIONAL GREENHOUSE GAS INITIATIVE ALL OF THE PROCEEDS
FROM THE SALE OF MARYLAND ALLOWANCES UNDER THE INITIATIVE SHALL BE
DEPOSITED IN THE MARYLAND STRATEGIC ENERGY INVESTMENT FUND UNDER §
9–20B–05 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
Article – Public Utilities
7–222.
(d) The Commission shall encourage and promote the efficient use and
conservation of energy in support of the greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals and
targets required under Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the Environment Article, established by the
Commission under § 7–223(b) of this subtitle, and specified in § 7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle
by:
(1) requiring each electric company and gas company to establish any
program or service that the Commission determines to be appropriate and cost–effective;
AND
(2) [adopting rate–making policies that provide, through a surcharge line
item on customer bills:
(i) full cost recovery of reasonably incurred costs for programs and
services established under item (1) of this subsection, including full recovery on a current
basis on or before January 1, 2028;
(ii) on or before December 31, 2032, the elimination of any unpaid
costs and unamortized costs that:
1. A. existed on December 31, 2024; or

HOUSE BILL 1525
B. were incurred before January 1, 2028; and
2. were accrued for the purpose of achieving statutory
targets for annual incremental gross energy savings;
(iii) compensation for any unpaid costs and unamortized costs under
item (ii) of this item at not more than each electric company’s and each gas company’s
average cost of outstanding debt; and
(iv) reasonable financial performance incentives and penalties for
investor–owned electric companies and gas companies, as appropriate; and
(3)] ensuring that adoption of electric customer choice under Subtitle 5 of
this title and gas customer choice under Subtitle 6 of this title does not adversely impact
these goals and targets.
[(e) The Commission shall, by regulation or order, require each electric company
and each gas company subject to subsection (a) of this section that has submitted to the
Commission, on or before July 1, 2024, a plan for achieving electricity or gas savings and
demand reduction targets to disclose the following information in a form and format readily
understandable to the average customer:
(1) that the surcharge imposed in accordance with subsection (d) of this
section includes the cost of paying down the unpaid costs and unamortized costs that were
accrued over time by programs and services required by the Commission dating back to
2008; and
(2) the period of time that the surcharge will include excess charges to pay
down the unpaid costs and unamortized costs.]
7–306.2.
(d) (1) (i) The Commission shall establish and maintain a Community
Solar Energy Generating Systems Program.
(e) On or before May 15, 2016, the Commission shall adopt regulations to
implement this section, including regulations for:
(2) a tariff structure for an electric company to provide a subscriber with
the kilowatt–hours or value of the subscriber’s subscription, as the Commission determines;
(f) (2) On or before July 1, 2025, the Commission shall approve electric
company tariff modifications that are consistent with the regulations adopted under this
subsection.

HOUSE BILL 1525 5
(g) (2) On or before January 1, 2026, the Commission shall approve electric
company tariff modifications that are consistent with the regulations adopted under this
subsection.
(H–1) A TARIFF ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (E)(2), (F)(2), OR (G)(2) OF
THIS SECTION MAY NOT REQUIRE AN ELECTRIC COMPANY TO PURCHASE, OR
PROVIDE A BILL CREDIT TO A SUBSCRIBER OR SUBSCRIBER ORGANIZATION, FOR
ELECTRICITY FROM A COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM AT A RATE
THAT EXCEEDS THE GENERATION COST OF ELECTRICITY PROVIDED BY THE
ELECTRIC COMPANY THROUGH STANDARD OFFER SERVICE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Governor shall notify the
Department of Legislative Services:
(1) within 5 days after withdrawing from the Regional Greenhouse Gas
Initiative in accordance with § 2–1002(g)(1) of the Environment Article, as enacted by
Section 1 of this Act; and
(2) within 5 days after the State rejoins the Regional Greenhouse Gas
Initiative in accordance with § 2–1002(g)(2) of the Environment Article, as enacted by
Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.